Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB626.
hereby enacts as follows:20250SB0626PN0643 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Skill Video Gaming Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person which applies for permission to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this act."Bearer scrip." A ticket that is a printed receipt from a skill video game system and is redeemable for cash equivalents."Camera system." A video camera system approved by the department and provided by an operator to an establishment that meets the specifications approved by the department."Cash." United States currency or coin."Cash equivalents." Instruments with a value equal to United States currency or coin, including certified checks, cashier's checks, money orders or other representations of value that the department deems a cash equivalent."Controlling interest." As follows:(1) For a publicly traded entity, the term means the holding of sole voting rights under State law or corporate articles or bylaws that entitle the person to elect or appoint one or more of the members of the board of directors or other governing board or the holding of an ownership or beneficial holding of 5% or more of the securities of the publicly traded legal entity, unless the presumption of 20250SB0626PN0643 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 control or ability to elect is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence.(2) For a privately held corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of privately held legal entity, the term means the holding of securities in the legal entity, unless the presumption of control is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Distributor." An entity licensed by the department that sells, leases, offers or provides and distributes skill video game systems to an operator for use or play in this Commonwealth."Entity." A domestic or foreign:(1) business corporation;(2) nonprofit corporation;(3) general partnership;(4) limited partnership;(5) limited liability company;(6) unincorporated nonprofit association;(7) professional association; or(8) business trust, common law business trust or statutory trust."Establishment." An entity licensed by the department that permits an operator to place and operate skill video game systems on the establishment's premises under this act."Gross revenue." The total of cash or cash equivalents received by a skill video game system minus the total of cash or cash equivalents paid out to players as a result of playing a skill video game system. The term does not include counterfeit cash or cash taken in a fraudulent act perpetrated against an 20250SB0626PN0643 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operator or establishment for which the operator or establishment is not reimbursed."Independent testing laboratory." A nongovernmental entity engaged in the business of examining skill video game software and capable of providing the certification specified in Chapter 7."Initial license." A license issued by the department to an approved applicant under this act."Net profits." The gross revenue after applicable taxes are paid to the department."Operator." An entity licensed by the department to operate a skill video game system by:(1) Purchasing or leasing skill video game systems from a licensed skill video game system distributor.(2) Providing skill video game systems to licensed establishments.(3) Providing onsite collection of skill video game system revenue and skill video game system data reporting as required by this act."Payout." The payment of cash or cash equivalent to player as a result of playing a skill video game system."Person." Includes a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, other association, government entity, other than the Commonwealth, estate, trust, foundation or natural person."Player." An individual who is at least 18 years of age when the individual plays a skill video game system."Principal." Any of the following:(1) An officer.(2) A director.20250SB0626PN0643 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A person who directly holds a beneficial interest in or ownership of the securities of an applicant or licensee.(4) A person who has a controlling interest in an applicant or licensee or has the ability to elect a majority of the board of directors of a licensee or to otherwise control a licensee, lender or other licensed financial institution of an applicant or licensee, other than a bank or lending institution which makes a loan or holds a mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of business, underwriter of an applicant or licensee.(5) A person deemed to be a principal by the department."Program." The program to regulate the distribution, sale, transportation, storage and use of skill video game systems established under Chapter 3."Provisional license." A license issued under section 2503."Registration information." The information required on the registration form provided by the department."Skill video game." A game played on skill video game software that meets the qualifications specified in Chapters 5 and 7 and has been licensed by the department as part of a skill video game system."Skill video game placement agreement." An agreement entered into by a distributor with an operator or an operator with an establishment for the placement, operation, service or maintenance of skill video game terminals."Skill video game software." A distributor's proprietary software program developed and designed for a skill video game system as approved by the department."Skill video game system." A terminal that is equipped with skill video game software connected to a terminal reporting 20250SB0626PN0643 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system."Terminal identification number." The unique number utilized to identify and verify a licensed skill video game system."Terminal reporting system." A system provided by the distributor and accessible by the department to which each skill video game system communicates for the purpose of auditing capacity and information retrieval of the details of a financial event that occurs in the operation of a skill video game system, including coin in, coin out, ticket in, ticket out and jackpots."Ticket redemption terminal." A terminal where a bearer scrip from a skill video game system may be redeemed for cash after a player has validated the player's age by utilizing a State-issued driver's license or identification card. A device used to validate the player's age may only read and verify the age from a State-issued driver's license or identification card and may not collect or retain any additional player information.CHAPTER 3PROGRAMSection 301. Regulation of skill video game systems.(a) Establishment.--A program to regulate the distribution, sale, transportation, storage and use of skill video game systems is established. The program shall be implemented and administered by the department. The department shall:(1) Issue licenses to participating individuals or companies to authorize them to design, program, license, sublicense, manufacture, transport, store and make available to the public a skill video game system within this Commonwealth in accordance with this act and regulations promulgated by the department.(2) Establish regulator and enforcement authority over 20250SB0626PN0643 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the program.(3) Develop enforcement procedures.(b) General authority and duties of department.--The department shall have general and sole regulatory authority over the sale, distribution and use of a skill video game system as described under this act.(c) Specific authority and duties of department.--The department shall have the specific power and duty to:(1) Collect taxes from a distributor.(2) Require and conduct or cause to be conducted criminal history investigations on applicants and licenses under this act.(3) For purposes of licensing and enforcement and background investigations, receive information otherwise protected by 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(4) Issue, approve, renew, revoke, suspend, condition or deny issuance or renewal of a license or approval provided under this act.(5) Require prospective and existing applicants and licensees to submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police, who shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation or an agency approved by the department for purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrest and convictions.(6) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this act. Except as provided in section 1903, regulations shall be adopted as provided under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), 20250SB0626PN0643 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(7) Require each person that holds a license issued under this act to provide the periodic reports required of licensees under this act.Section 302. Sale, manufacturing, distribution, operation and use of skill video game systems.The sale, distribution, operation, possession, transportation and use of a skill video game system in compliance with this act are authorized in this Commonwealth. A skill video game system shall not be deemed:(1) A lottery, gambling device, slot machine, device intrinsically connected with gambling or coin-operated amusement device.(2) "Games of chance" as defined under section 103 of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(3) As conducting another business on a licensed premises under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, or 40 Pa. Code § 3.52 (relating to connection with other business).CHAPTER 5ORGANIZATIONSection 501. Licenses.(a) Issuance.--The department shall have the authority to issue licenses under this act.(b) Provisional licenses.--The department shall issue a provisional license to operate a skill video game system beginning on the effective date of this subsection to a 20250SB0626PN0643 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributor, operator or establishment that meets the requirements of section 2503.(c) Skill video game system license.--An initial application period shall commence at a date set by the department. An initial license may be utilized on the date the department issues the initial license and shall remain valid for a minimum of one year or until the department establishes a date for the annual renewal of licenses.(d) License criteria.--The granting of a license by the department shall be subject to and dependent upon the applicant's criminal history record information and other criteria established by department regulation.(e) License renewal.--An application to renew a license shall be filed with the department prior to the expiration of the license.Section 502. Licensing requirements.An entity, including each principal holding a controlling interest, which seeks a distributor, operator and establishment licensee shall be considered an applicant and shall provide the following information for an initial or renewal license:(1) Identification, including a driver's license or passport.(2) Naturalization papers or resident alien identification, if applicable.(3) Resident information for the previous five years.(4) Employment information for the previous five years, including dates employed and the name and address of the employers so that a criminal history and credit check can be completed.(5) An individual questionnaire provided by the 20250SB0626PN0643 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department for each principal who lives outside of this Commonwealth.(6) Proof that the applicant has not had a felony conviction within the last five years.(7) Proof that the applicant has never been convicted of a gambling-related felony.(8) Proof that the applicant has timely filed and satisfied all Federal, State and local taxes.Section 503. Granting licenses.(a) Process.--The department may grant, deny or revoke a license under this act.(b) Determination.--In making a decision under subsection (a), the department shall determine whether the applicant is able to comply with all applicable laws of this Commonwealth and regulations relating to the activities in which the applicant intends to engage under this act.(c) Privilege.--The issuance or renewal of a license shall be a revocable privilege.(d) Multiple licenses.--An entity holding a license may only hold one type of license and may not hold another type of license.(e) Appeals.--If the department denies an application, the applicant shall have 30 days from the date of the department's mailing of the denial to the applicant to file an appeal of the denial. The appeal shall be filed with the Secretary of Revenue. The appeal of a decision by the Secretary of Revenue shall be filed with Commonwealth Court.(f) Prior operation.--Prior operation of a skill game shall not be a basis for denying a license.Section 504. Application and renewal costs of licenses.20250SB0626PN0643 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Payment.--The fee for an initial or renewal license application shall be payable to the department when the application or renewal is submitted.(b) Initial license and costs.--An initial license application fee shall be nonrefundable to an applicant. Initial license application fees shall be as follows:(1) A skill video game system distributor initial application fee, $1,000,000.(2) A skill video game system operator initial license application fee, $25,000.(3) A skill video game system establishment initial license application fee, $250.(c) Renewal license and costs.--A renewal license application fee shall be nonrefundable. Renewal license application fees shall be as follows:(1) A skill video game system distributor annual renewal license application fee, $100,000.(2) A skill video game system operator annual renewal license application fee, $5,000.(3) A skill video game system establishment annual renewal license application fee, $250.Section 505. Allocation of skill video game system revenue after tax.The allocation of percentage of net profits earned shall be as follows:(1) An establishment shall receive 40%.(2) An operator shall receive 40%.(3) A distributor shall receive 20%.Section 506. Issuance of license.A license issued by the department to a participant shall be 20250SB0626PN0643 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective only for the specified period and shall include information required by the department.Section 507. Term of license.(a) Provisional license.--A provisional license shall be valid until the issuance or denial of an initial license.(b) Initial license.--An initial license shall remain valid for one calendar year.(c) Renewal license.--A renewal license shall be valid for one calendar year from the date of issuance.Section 508. License renewal.(a) Renewal.--An application for a renewal license shall include information required by the department.(b) Approval.--The department shall renew a license using the same process for granting licenses under this chapter.(c) Nonrenewal decision.--A decision to deny or not renew a license by the department shall include a notice specifying in detail how the applicant has not satisfied the department's requirements for renewal. The department may request additional information from the applicant before deciding to grant or deny an application for renewal. If the department denies a renewal, the applicant may appeal the decision to Commonwealth Court.Section 509. Suspension or revocation of license.The department may suspend or revoke a license if the participant violates any provision of this act or regulation of the department.CHAPTER 7CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTSSection 701. Skill video game system testing.(a) Certification.--Prior to obtaining an initial license under Chapter 5, a skill video game system must be certified 20250SB0626PN0643 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (b) in accordance with the following:(1) Before the distributor sells, leases, licenses, provides or distributes game software not qualified or approved by the program as skill video game software, the distributor shall supply to the department an engineering report and opinion in complete forensic detail by an independent testing laboratory, with experience in testing skill video game software and approved by the department, and based on an examination of a prototype or production sample of the skill video game software and approved skill video game system to be certified. The testing required under this paragraph shall be based only on skill video game software, and the technical specifications shall be agreed to be independent from slot machine technical specifications engineered for casino or video game terminal play. The engineering report and opinion shall:(i) Be restricted in scope to technical detail and shall not be otherwise relied upon as a legal opinion regarding whether skill or chance are predominant in winner determination or as an interpretation of law.(ii) Be signed by a principal or executive officer of an independent testing laboratory, which signature shall constitute the laboratory's certification regarding its contents.(iii) State, at a minimum, a written certification to the department that the skill video game software is one in which:(A) Skill of the player rather than an element of chance is the predominant factor affecting the skill video game's outcome.20250SB0626PN0643 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) The skill video game requires the prize outcome for the single play and over a session of gameplay to be such that without the player exercising skill during the main phases of gameplay, it would be impossible to win the prize offered.(C) There must be no hard-coded minimum or maximum payout percentage for a skill video game.(D) There must not be any reflexive, compensating algorithm that makes the skill video game harder when it detects a highly skilled player or when the skill video game's payout percentage goes above 100%.(E) An average player can learn to score and win effectively on a skill video game.(F) A player is informed of the criteria used in selecting winners and rules are available for viewing at any time other than in the middle of a skill video game in play.(G) Skill video games must be programmed to keep true and accurate gameplay records, with a minimum of 10 game recall, and the number of payouts from the skill video game, with a minimum of 10 voucher recall. Accounting meters must be at least eight digits in length, with six digits to the left of the decimal.(H) The skill video game is programmed so that a maximum price to play is $5 and the maximum winnings per individual game are $5,000.(I) The skill video game allows for the display of the software version, as well as lists of hardware 20250SB0626PN0643 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 components of the approved terminal, in an easily identifiable and accurate manner.(2) A skill video game system shall remain certified and valid unless material changes are made to the skill video game software or equipment as deemed necessary by the department.(3) A distributor applicant applying for an initial license shall provide the distributor applicant's skill video game software in a manner consistent with rules and regulations promulgated by the department.(4) Certification of the requirements under this subsection shall be made to the department by the distributor, who shall represent that the certification is being made subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(b) Certification.--An independent testing laboratory approved by the department shall provide a certification as provided under this act.(c) Field verification of certified skill video game software.--The software distributor's skill video game software shall allow for random field verification by an agent or designee of the department. The distributor shall supply the department with the unique signature of the application software being tested and instructions allowing an agent or designee of the department to field verify a production copy of the skill video game system.(d) Trademark, copyright, trade secret and confidential proprietary material.--Nothing in this act is intended to violate, compromise or facilitate infringement of or make public material created, owned or possessed by a distributor. 20250SB0626PN0643 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Intellectual property or other material or information provided by a software distributor to the department for inspection shall be deemed as trademarked, copyrighted, a trade secret or confidential proprietary material, and the material shall not be subject to public access or inspection.Section 702. Bonding.(a) Eligibility.--To be eligible for a provisional or initial license, a distributor shall execute a $1,000,000 bond within 30 days of issuance of the license. The bond shall specifically protect the department's tax collection under this act, not the software provider.(b) Surety.--Each bond shall have as a surety a duly authorized surety company or two sufficient individual sureties approved by the department.(c) Condition.--The bond is conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the software provider to pay applicable taxes, fees and fines required by this act.(d) Suspension or revocation.--Unless the bond is filed with the department within the 30-day time period under subsection (a), the department may suspend the initial license. Failure to maintain an acceptable bond shall be grounds for license revocation.Section 703. Reporting.(a) Monthly report.--Each distributor shall utilize a terminal reporting system for the distributor's skill video game system. A distributor shall submit a monthly report to the department providing the following for the prior month:(1) The complete tracking of all revenue derived through the operation of all skill video game systems in operation within all establishments.20250SB0626PN0643 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The reporting of gameplay statistics, including cash in, cash out and numbers of games played.(3) The physical locations of all skill video game systems in possession of a distributor, operator or establishment in this Commonwealth.(b) Annual report.--By July 30 of each year, for the prior year's business, each distributor shall report to the department the following:(1) The total number of skill video game systems that operators purchased from a distributor, including all terminal identification numbers.(2) The number and type of skill video game systems that operators have located within each establishment.(3) The total number of skill video game systems and the terminal identification numbers that each entity has in inventory as of June 30.(4) The total number of skill video game systems in operation by county.(5) The total number of skill video game systems in operation by municipality.CHAPTER 9DISTRIBUTORSSection 901. Authorization.A distributor, once licensed by the department, shall be authorized to distribute terminals and associated devices for skill video gaming that comply with the requirements under Chapter 5.Section 902. System requirements.(a) Currency.--A skill video game system shall be equipped with the ability to accept currency and shall distribute 20250SB0626PN0643 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 winnings by ejection of a bearer scrip, card or other means approved by the department redeemable only for cash at the establishment where played. Winnings from players shall be redeemed at a ticket redemption terminal or by an attendant within the establishment where the bearer scrip or card was created.(b) Internet.--A skill video game system shall be connected to the Internet for purposes of security, authentication and redemption or data collection and control.(c) External ports.--Except as may be approved by the department for the field verification of skill video game software signatures, a skill video game system shall not have an external data port or disk drive outside of a locked area within the terminal.(d) Rules of play.--The skill video game system shall prominently display the rules of play either on the game screen or on the terminal.(e) Placard.--Each skill video game system shall bear a placard in a prominent location and in a prominent color stating as follows:This game is licensed by the Pennsylvania Department of Revenue and is NOT operated or maintained by the Pennsylvania State Lottery. Players must be 18 years of age or older to play.(f) Age verification.--The skill video game system shall be operated only if the establishment has validated the player's age by utilizing a State-issued driver's license or identification card. A device used to validate the player's age may only read and verify the age from a State-issued driver's license or identification card and may not collect or retain any 20250SB0626PN0643 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional player information.(g) Other markings.--Each skill video game system shall display the name of the distributor of the terminal and contact information for the operator, including a mailing address and telephone number.CHAPTER 11OPERATORSSection 1101. Authorization.An operator shall do the following:(1) Purchase, lease, license, sublicense or provide approved skill video game systems from a distributor.(2) Distribute skill video game systems to establishments under terms approved by the department.(3) Collect and report skill video game system income and reconcile with a terminal reporting system.(4) Accept returns of skill video game systems from establishments per regulations promulgated by the department.Section 1102. Skill video game system placement agreements.(a) Contract.--Within 60 days of receiving an initial license, an operator shall enter into a contract with a licensed distributor. In addition to any additional minimum standards for the contract that the department requires, a skill video game placement agreement shall:(1) Include a provision rendering the agreement invalid if either party's license or application is denied, revoked, not renewed, withdrawn or surrendered.(2) Provide the operator with 40% of the net profits.(b) Term.--A skill video game placement agreement may be active for a minimum term of five years but shall not exceed 10 years.20250SB0626PN0643 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1103. Player security.Each establishment shall be provided a camera system from the operator which shall be pointed directly on skill video game systems and shall always be active. The camera system shall record and collect all video footage. The video footage shall be maintained and stored for the immediately prior 60 days.Section 1104. Reporting.An operator using the terminal reporting system shall submit a monthly report to the distributor. The distributor shall provide to the department a monthly report that includes the terminal identification number in an operator's inventory and within each establishment for the prior month.CHAPTER 13ESTABLISHMENTSSection 1301. Authorization.An establishment shall do the following:(1) Utilize skill video game systems from operators for entertainment and play by the public.(2) Return unused, damaged or inoperable skill video game systems to the operator.Section 1302. Skill video game placement agreements.(a) Contract.--Within 60 days of receiving an initial license, an establishment shall enter into a contract with an operator. In addition to any minimum standards for contract that the department requires, a skill video game placement agreement shall:(1) Include a provision rendering the skill video game placement agreement invalid if either party's license or application is denied, revoked, not renewed, withdrawn or surrendered.20250SB0626PN0643 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Provide the establishment with 40% of the net profits.(b) Term.--A skill video game placement agreement may be active for a minimum term of five years but shall not exceed 10 years.Section 1303. Limits on skill video game terminals.(a) Terminals.--An establishment may have a maximum of two skill video game terminals per 500 square feet of public floor common space available to the patrons of the establishment.(b) Number of terminals.--(1) An establishment may not exceed five approved skill video game terminals.(2) An establishment that is owned by an organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) may not exceed 10 approved skill video game terminals.(c) Placement.--Skill video game terminals shall be placed in public floor space visible to patrons and employees.Section 1304. Prohibition on miniature casinos and stop and gos.(a) General rule.--An operator is prohibited from installing skill video game systems in an establishment where the sole or primary source of annual net revenue is derived from skill video game systems.(b) Exemption.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to an organization established under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).Section 1305. Limitation of access by individuals under 18 years of age.The department shall promulgate regulations, including 20250SB0626PN0643 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employee training for detecting fake identification cards, for licensed establishments to ensure the play of skill video game systems by individuals under 18 years of age. Under no circumstances shall an establishment redeem a skill video game system redeemable bearer scrip, card or other means approved by the department from an individual under 18 years of age. Establishment licensees are required to post problem gaming signage and make problem gaming informational materials, the terms of which shall be established by the department, available at the establishment.Section 1306. Qualifications for establishments.(a) Play.--Skill video game systems shall be played only at:(1) an establishment licensed by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board;(2) an organization established under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.); or(3) a business that sells age-restricted products such as tobacco or is licensed by the Pennsylvania Lottery.(b) License required.--An establishment under subsection (a) must be licensed by the Commonwealth to operate a skill video game system.(c) Subdivision prohibited.--An establishment shall consist of one physical building and may not be subdivided for the purposes of obtaining additional licenses to operate skill video game systems.CHAPTER 15PLAYERSSection 1501. Authorization.It shall be lawful for a user to play and receive winnings 20250SB0626PN0643 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from a skill video game system dispensed in the form of a bearer scrip, card or other means approved by the department which is redeemable only at the establishment for cash. Cash shall not be dispensed directly by the terminal.Section 1502. Winnings.A player's net winnings from the play of a licensed skill video game terminal shall be classified as compensation under section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.CHAPTER 17TAXSection 1701. Tax imposed.(a) Tax.--A tax of 16% of all gross profits generated by skill video game system play shall be paid to the Commonwealth by the distributor. The distributor shall submit to the department by the 20th of each month:(1) A report of gross profits under this subsection for the prior month.(2) Any tax payments due under this subsection for the prior month.(b) Deposit.--Revenue received from the tax imposed under this section shall be distributed by the department and shall be proportioned monthly under the following formula:(1) Fifty percent of the revenue shall be deposited into the Clean Streams Fund.(2) Twenty-two percent of the revenue shall be distributed to individual counties proportionally based upon the gross profits derived from the operation of all skill video game systems within that county.(3) Twenty-two percent of the revenue shall be 20250SB0626PN0643 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributed to individual municipalities based on the gross profits derived from the operation of skill video game systems within that municipality.(4) Six percent of the revenue shall be distributed to the Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement for the purpose of enforcing this act.(c) Exemption.--Revenue generated from approved skill video game terminals being played by the public and game credit licenses to supply skill video game systems shall not be subjected to the tax imposed under section 202 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(d) Information.--The distributor, operator and establishment shall provide to the department any information required by the department for the department's assessment and review of taxes under this section.(e) Prohibition on local fees and taxes.--No additional taxes or fees, including amusement taxes, may be imposed on the placement of a skill video game system or the revenue generated by a terminal unless specifically authorized under this act.CHAPTER 19ADMINISTRATIONSection 1901. Governing practices and procedures.The provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure) shall apply to all actions of the department under this act constituting an adjudication as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions).Section 1902. Law enforcement notification.The department may notify law enforcement of information relating to any violation or suspected violation of this act.20250SB0626PN0643 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1903. Temporary regulation.(a) Promulgation.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations as outlined in section 2503. The department may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire two years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(c) Publication.--The department shall transmit notice of the temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin no later than six months after the effective date of this subsection.Section 1904. Reports by licensees.An operator and establishment shall file a monthly report with the distributor as designated by the department. The distributor shall make the reports available to the department.CHAPTER 21OFFENSES RELATED TO OPERATION OFUNLICENSED SKILL VIDEO GAMESSection 2101. Criminal distribution and operation of unlicensed skill video game terminals.20250SB0626PN0643 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Penalties.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the person owns, operates, maintains, places into operation or has a financial interest in an unlicensed skill video game, skill video game system or skill video game software or a business that owns, operates, maintains or places into operation or has a financial interest in an unlicensed skill video game, skill video game system or skill video game software:(1) which is offered or made available to persons to play or participate for direct or indirect consideration, including consideration associated with a related product, service or activity; and(2) for which the person playing the unlicensed skill video game system may become eligible for a cash or cash-equivalent prize, whether or not the eligibility for or value of the cash or cash-equivalent prize is determined by or has any relationship to the outcome of or play of the unlicensed skill video game system.(b) Forfeiture.--An unlicensed skill video game, skill video game system or skill video game software owned, operated maintained or placed into operation in violation of subsection (a) shall be seized and forfeited to the Commonwealth. The forfeiture shall be conducted in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5803 (relating to asset forfeiture), 5805 (relating to forfeiture procedure), 5806 (relating to motion for return of property), 5807 (relating to restrictions on use), 5807.1 (relating to prohibition on adoptive seizures) and 5808 (relating to exceptions).CHAPTER 23OFFENSES RELATED TO ILLEGAL MANUFACTURING,20250SB0626PN0643 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DISTRIBUTION OR OPERATION OF SKILL VIDEO GAMESSection 2301. Law enforcement.(a) General criminal enforcement.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement of the Pennsylvania State Police shall be responsible for enforcement of the criminal provisions of this act.(b) Counties of the first class.--In addition to the Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement of the Pennsylvania State Police, a local law enforcement agency may enforce the criminal provisions of this act in a county of the first class.(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "local law enforcement agency" includes the Philadelphia Police Department.Section 2302. Criminal distribution of skill video game systems.In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the person illegally sells, leases, licenses, sublicenses or distributes to any person or entity a skill video game system without being properly licensed by the department and contracted with a software provider.Section 2303. Criminal alteration of skill video game software, terminal or related equipment.In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits a felony of the third degree if the person intentionally, knowingly or recklessly alters a skill video game system, skill video game software or skill video game terminal in any manner so that:(1) chance, rather than predominant skill, is the factor affecting the prize outcome of the skill video game on a 20250SB0626PN0643 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 single-play basis and on the basis of a session of single plays;(2) a player does not have an opportunity on every play to win back more than what was spent to play the skill video game; or(3) a skill video game terminal is capable of issuing currency, coins, a stored-value card or other cash equivalent or other medium of exchange.Section 2304. Criminal redemption of value to individual under 18 years of age.In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits a summary offense if the person provides value of any kind to an individual under 18 years of age in exchange for an approved skill video game terminal redeemable bearer scrip.Section 2305. Additional penalties.(a) Civil penalties.--In addition to any other remedy available to the department, the department may assess a civil penalty for any violation of this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or order issued under this act. The following penalties shall apply:(1) The department may assess a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation and an additional penalty of not more than $1,000 for each day of a continuing violation. In determining the amount of each penalty, the department shall take the following into consideration:(i) The gravity of the violation.(ii) The willfulness of the violation.(iii) Previous violations, if any, by the person being assessed.(iv) The economic benefit to the person being 20250SB0626PN0643 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessed for failing to comply with the requirements of this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or an order issued under this act.(2) The department may issue a written warning in lieu of a civil penalty to a person or entity who aids, abets, counsels, induces, procures or causes another person to violate this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or an order issued under this act.(b) Sanctions.--(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the department may impose the following sanctions:(i) The revocation or suspension of the license of a person found to be in violation of this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or an order issued under this act.(ii) The revocation or suspension of the license of a person for conduct or activity or the occurrence of an event that would have disqualified the person from receiving the license.(iii) The ordering of restitution of money or property unlawfully obtained or retained by a licensee.(2) A person who aids, abets, counsels, induces, procures or causes another person to violate this act shall be subject to the sanctions provided under paragraph (1).(c) Cost of action.--The department may assess against a person determined to be in violation of this act the cost of investigation of the violation.(d) Insignificant violations.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the assessment of a civil penalty or the imposition of a sanction for an insignificant violation of this 20250SB0626PN0643 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act if the department determines that the public interest will be adequately served under the circumstances by the issuance of a written warning.Section 2306. Surrendering illegal skill video games and equipment.For a period of 90 days from the effective date of this section, a skill video game, skill video game device or other skill video game equipment not licensed by this act or another law of this Commonwealth may, without criminal penalty or fine, be surrendered by a person to the Commonwealth at designated drop-off facilities around this Commonwealth as determined by law enforcement and the department. All games, devices and equipment surrendered shall be recycled or destroyed at the direction of law enforcement. Costs for this service shall be covered by fees and taxes generated under this act.CHAPTER 25MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 2501. Conflict.The sale, manufacture, distribution, possession and use of approved skill video games, skill video game terminals or other related skill video game equipment approved by the department in compliance with this act shall not be deemed to be a violation of 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming), 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.) or the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.Section 2502. Zoning.A distributor, operator and establishment shall only have to meet the same municipal zoning and use requirements as other similar business types that are located in the same zoning 20250SB0626PN0643 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district. A municipality may not:(1) prohibit the placement or play of skill games; or(2) approve municipal zoning or land use requirements that restrict or prohibit placement, use or play of an approved skill video game terminal in a zoning district that allows any of the following:(i) the sale of beer, wine and spirits;(ii) the sale or play of State lottery games at commercial establishments; or(iii) gaming or wagering conducted under 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).Section 2503. Provisional licenses.(a) Provisional licenses.--(1) A distributor that has filed registration information with the department under this section shall be permitted to continue operation.(2) Within 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph, a distributor shall collect and submit to the department the licenses application fee payments and registration information of all licensees. The following shall apply:(i) A submission to the department under this paragraph shall include prepayment of the initial license fee and the registration information.(ii) A distributor shall promptly submit registration information to the department as the information pertains to operators and establishments in compliance with the guidelines provided by the department.(iii) Upon submission of registration information, a 20250SB0626PN0643 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participant shall be considered to have a provisional license pending.(iv) The fee shall be the same as the initial license application fee under section 504. A payment under this paragraph shall be considered payment in full for an initial license application fee.(v) A provisional license shall be valid until the department approves and issues the initial license under this act.(vi) A payment shall be forfeited if the department declines to issue the initial license or revokes the provisional license.(vii) If a license is denied or revoked, the licensee shall cease the distribution, operation or use of skill video game systems or related equipment.(viii) An establishment shall not be allowed to operate with a provisional license without having been approved by a distributor who has submitted the establishment's name and information to the department.(ix) A distributor, operator and establishment may buy, use, sell, lease, license or otherwise provide skill video game systems or related equipment as prescribed by the department.(x) A distributor may not sell, lease, license or otherwise provide skill video game systems or ticket redemption terminals to an operator or establishment that does not qualify or hold a provisional license.(xi) A distributor or operator may not sell, lease, license or otherwise provide a skill video game system or ticket redemption terminal to an establishment that does 20250SB0626PN0643 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not qualify or hold a provisional license.(xii) During the provisional license period, the taxes required under Chapter 17 shall apply to provisional licensees.(xiii) Each month, a distributor shall be required to submit a report of terminal identification numbers, location names, addresses, cash-in, cash-out, tax amounts per terminal and tax payments to the department no later than the 15th day of the following month.(3) Beginning 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph, a distributor or operator may not apply for a provisional license.(4) An establishment may continue to obtain provisional licenses in accordance with this section.(5) One year after receipt of an initial license, an entity shall apply for a renewal license.(b) License fee.--An applicant who applies and pays for a provisional license application shall not be required to pay an additional initial license application fee once final rules and regulations are promulgated by the department. If, for any reason, the applicant is denied, the applicant shall forfeit the payment to the department.(c) Enforcement.--Within 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, a distributor shall coordinate with the department to ensure that only provisional licensees are operating accepted skill video games and approved skill video game terminals. A distributor shall provide all tools for law enforcement to validate approved skill video game software and skill video game terminals in the field utilizing terminal identification numbers.20250SB0626PN0643 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2504. Civil actions.The following apply:(1) A civil action may be brought by a private party against a person who conducts any of the following activities in this Commonwealth without a valid license to conduct the activities under this act:(i) sells, leases, licenses or otherwise provides skill video game software;(ii) sells, leases, licenses, provides or otherwise distributes approved skill video game terminals; or(iii) possesses and is permitting play of an approved skill video game terminal.(2) A person commits a felony of the third degree if the person performs any of the acts for which a private party may bring a civil action under paragraph (1).Section 2505. Notice.The department shall provide notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the department's date of commencement of licensing under Chapter 3.Section 2506. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect immediately:Chapter 25.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0626PN0643 - 36 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728